Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-141
Division; air navigation facilities; acquire by purchase, gift, or condemnation; establish; improve; operate; dispose of property; exception.

The division is authorized and empowered, on behalf of and in the name of this state, within the limitation of available appropriations, to (1) acquire, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation proceedings, or otherwise, real or personal property for the purpose of establishing and constructing airports, restricted landing areas, and other air navigation facilities, (2) acquire in like manner, own, control, establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, and police such airports, restricted landing areas, and other air navigation facilities either within or without this state, (3) make, prior to any such acquisition, investigations, surveys, and plans, (4) erect, install, construct, and maintain at such airports facilities for the servicing of aircraft and for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers, and (5) dispose of any such property, airport, or restricted landing area or any other air navigation facility by sale, lease, or otherwise, in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other like property of the state. The division may not, however, acquire or take over any airport, restricted landing area, or other air navigation facility owned or controlled by a municipality of this state without the consent of such municipality. The division may erect, equip, operate, and maintain on any airport such buildings and equipment as are necessary and proper to establish, maintain, and conduct such airport and air navigation facilities connected therewith.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 11(1), p. 96;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 34.